Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3717
Rules and regulations.

The Director of Agriculture and the Attorney General may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act.

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 20.